Connecticut, session 2026, HB05404.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
2 Administrative Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of
3 Emergency Services and Public Protection and the State Fire
4 Administrator, shall establish a job classification for part-time fire
5 service instructors within the Division of Fire Services Administration
6 within the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PS Joint Favorable
HB5404 / File No. 267 1

HB5404 File No. 267
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the creation of a job classification for part-
time fire service instructors, results in no cost to the state.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5404 / File No. 267 2

HB5404 File No. 267
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5404
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A JOB CLASSIFICATION FOR PART-TIME
FIRE SERVICE INSTRUCTORS.